Arkansas, session 2025, SB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the University of Arkansas for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Dean of Business Administration 1 $535,685
(2) Dean of Engineering 1 $464,261
(3) Chancellor 1 $392,837
(4) Assoc. Dean of Walton Coll. of Bus. 4 $378,873
(5) Vice Chan. for Advancement/Development 1 $321,557
*HAR040*
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
(6) Assoc. Vice Chan. for Advancement 3 $302,841
(7) Provost 1 $293,291
(8) Assoc. Vice Chan. for Univ. Info. 1 $281,362
(9) Assoc. Dean of Engineering 3 $272,788
(10) Dean of Law 1 $262,914
(11) Vice Chan. for Finance & Administration 1 $262,914
(12) Dean 8 $252,642
(13) Vice Chancellor 2 $250,129
(14) Associate Dean 13 $241,167
(15) Sr. Asst. Dean of Business 1 $241,167
(16) Vice Chan. for Govt. & Comm. Rel. 1 $238,112
(17) Associate Vice Chancellor 6 $235,373
(18) Vice Provost 6 $235,373
(19) Dir. of Community Design Ctr. 1 $223,888
(20) Director of Deferred Giving 1 $221,417
(21) Assoc. Vice Provost for Research 2 $218,054
(22) Asst. V-C for Advancement 2 $217,051
(23) Dir. of Corp & Foundation Relations 1 $210,637
(24) Dir. of Research & Sponsored Programs 1 $208,138
(25) Project/Program Administrator 534
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(26) IT Pool 194
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(27) Director of Academic Computing 1 $197,997
(28) Assoc. Vice Chan. for Finance 1 $187,610
(29) Director of Outreach 2 $185,178
(30) Major Gift Development Officer 31 $185,178
(31) Assistant Vice Chancellor 4 $184,895
(32) Assoc. Vice Chan. for Admin. 1 $184,187
(33) Director of Institutional Research 1 $182,474
(34) Assoc. Director of Univ. Info. Tech. 7 $181,377
(35) Assistant to the Chancellor 1 $180,299
(36) Assistant Dean 12 $177,338
(37) Asst. Vice Provost for Research 2 $177,338
(38) Associate Dir. of Development 1 $175,285
(39) Director of Alumni Relations 1 $175,285
(40) Director of Executive Education 1 $174,724
(41) Assoc. Vice Chan. for Business 1 $173,915
(42) Financial Systems Coord. 1 $173,915
(43) Director of Research Accounting 1 $168,312
(44) Director of Information Technology 7 $166,108
(45) Controller 1 $163,598
(46) Director of Financial Aid 1 $163,598
(47) Director of Special Events 1 $163,598
(48) Director of Engineering Systems 5 $160,132
(49) Associate Vice Provost 2 $159,434
(50) Registrar 1 $158,833
(51) Director of Career Services 1 $156,658
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
(52) Investment Manager 1 $156,658
(53) Dir. of Financial & Mgt. Analysis 1 $155,259
(54) Director of Affirmative Action 1 $154,818
(55) Development/Advancement Admin 52
Development/Advancement Director $154,739
Development/Advancement Manager $123,019
Development/Advancement Specialist $106,139
(56) Asst. Dir. Res. Support & Spons. Progs. 1 $154,218
(57) Assessment Director 1 $150,379
(58) Business Manager 1 $148,637
(59) Dir. Business and Economic Research 1 $148,203
(60) Assoc. Controller 1 $145,172
(61) Annual Fund Coordinator 1 $143,176
(62) Budget Director 1 $143,176
(63) Director of Distance Learning 1 $142,562
(64) Director of University Police 1 $141,477
(65) Architect 1 $139,235
(66) Dir. of General Adult Education 1 $135,746
(67) Assoc. Director Information Technology 4 $134,335
(68) Assoc. Dir. of Executive Education 2 $129,974
(69) Dir. of the Office of Industry Engage 1 $129,974
(70) Dir. of Credit Studies 1 $129,480
(71) Director of Student Activities 1 $128,623
(72) Master Scientific Research Tech. 16 $123,019
(73) Director of University Relations 1 $121,808
(74) Academic Counselor 77 $120,656
(75) Asst. to the Provost 1 $119,435
(76) Student Development Specialist 87 $115,871
(77) Asst. Dir. of Affirm Action 2 $111,754
(78) Coord. of Academic Space 1 $111,360
(79) Assoc. Dir. of Enhanced Learning Ctr. 1 $108,268
(80) Associate Director of Admissions 1 $108,117
(81) Associate Director of Financial Aid 1 $108,117
(82) Police Captain 4 $107,137
(83) Instructional Designer 23 $106,742
(84) Coordinator of Grants Management 8 $106,608
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
(85) Conference Coordinator 10 $104,390
(86) Engineer Supervisor 1 $103,579
(87) Scientific Research Technologist 18 $101,740
(88) Assistant to the Dean 10 $96,726
(89) Fiscal Support Pool 118
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(90) Public Information Manager 1 $92,082
(91) Public Safety Pool 55
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(92) Associate Registrar 6 $88,541
(93) UAF Construction Coordinator 7 $88,541
(94) Licensing Administrator 1 $87,485
(95) Personnel Manager 3 $85,136
(96) Procurement Manager 1 $85,136
(97) Buyer Supervisor 1 $78,713
(98) Development Specialist 10 $78,713
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
(99) Payroll Services Coordinator 2 $78,713
(100) Procurement Coordinator 5 $78,713
(101) Editor 2 $75,685
(102) Human Resources Analyst 10 $75,685
(103) Maintenance Coordinator 3 $75,685
(104) Research Project Analyst 5 $75,685
(105) Staff Development Coordinator 1 $75,685
(106) Skilled Trades Pool 142
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(107) Buyer 3 $69,975
(108) Const./Maintenance Coordinator 1 $69,975
(109) EEO/Grievance Officer 2 $69,975
(110) HEI Program Coordinator 76 $69,975
(111) Human Resources Recruiter 1 $69,975
(112) Occupational Safety Coordinator 4 $69,975
(113) Public Information Specialist 2 $69,975
(114) Student Applications Specialist 8 $69,975
(115) Administrative Support Pool 234
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(116) Assistant Registrar 2 $67,284
(117) Benefits Analyst 1 $67,284
(118) Fabrication Shop Manager 1 $67,284
(119) Financial Aid Analyst 10 $67,284
(120) Library Support Pool 43
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(121) Maintenance Supervisor 3 $67,284
(122) Payroll Services Specialist 4 $67,284
(123) Special Events Manager 4 $67,284
(124) Student Accounts Officer 2 $67,284
(125) Architectural Draftsman 1 $64,696
(126) Warehouse Manager 1 $64,696
(127) Financial Aid Specialist 2 $62,208
(128) Human Resources Specialist 5 $62,208
(129) Inventory Control Manager 3 $62,208
(130) Landscape Supervisor 5 $62,208
(131) Lodge Housekeeping Supervisor 1 $62,208
(132) Logistics Manager 1 $62,208
(133) Photographer 1 $62,208
(134) Research Assistant 1 $59,815
(135) Coordinator of Housekeeping 11 $57,515
(136) Equipment Mechanic 2 $55,302
(137) Landscape Specialist 3 $55,302
(138) Payroll Officer 1 $55,302
(139) Warehouse Specialist 1 $55,302
(140) Admissions Analyst 5 $53,175
(141) Heavy Equipment Operator 8 $53,175
(142) Cashier 3 $51,130
(143) Inventory Control Technician 8 $51,130
(144) Mail Services Coordinator 1 $49,164
(145) Registrar's Assistant 9 $49,164
(146) Special Events Worker 1 $47,272
(147) Institutional Services Supervisor 19 $43,706
(148) Institutional Services Assistant 136 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(149) Faculty 202
Distinguished Professor $466,257
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
University Professor $253,548
Professor - Law $240,147
Professor $234,194
Associate Professor - Law $217,696
Associate Professor $199,779
Assistant Professor $189,025
Instructor $134,719
Master Teacher $126,984
(150) Departmental Chairperson - WCOB 7 $390,239
(151) Department Chairperson - Engineering 8 $371,409
(152) Department Chairperson 33 $321,557
(153) Library Faculty 47
Librarian $161,175
Associate Librarian $148,295
Assistant Librarian $123,035
(154) Research Associate 38 $159,536
(155) Curator Faculty 1
Curator $159,535
Assoc. Curator $151,080
Asst. Curator $123,035
(156) Senior Graduate Assistant 145 $137,524
(157) Post Doctoral Fellow 31 $126,046
(158) Senior Research Assistant 40 $100,907
(159) Teaching Associate 31 $100,907
(160) Senior Library Assistant 20 $96,743
(161) Graduate Assistant 226 $75,763
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(162) Walton College of Business Faculty 148
Distinguished Professor - WCOB $390,240
University Professor $375,995
Professor $361,751
Associate Professor $281,362
Assistant Professor $257,245
(163) Faculty 946
Distinguished Professor $321,557
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
Distinguished Professor - Law $252,557
University Professor $241,167
Professor - Law $235,986
Professor $230,254
Associate Professor - Law $203,374
Associate Professor $189,025
Assistant Professor - Law $189,025
Assistant Professor $183,233
Instructor $121,805
Lecturer $107,878
(164) College of Engineering Faculty 142
Distinguished Professor - Engineering $371,409
University Professor $314,771
Professor $272,788
Associate Professor $227,324
Assistant Professor $189,436
(165) Senior Graduate Assistant 115 $128,527
(166) Research Associate 2 $119,296
(167) Graduate Assistant 440 $75,763
ARKANSAS GARVAN WOODLAND GARDENS
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(168) Project/Program Administrator 13
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(169) Exec. Dir. Arkansas Garvan Gardens 1 $155,468
U of A FAYETTEVILLE
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(170) Vice Chancellor - Athletics 1 $681,971
(171) Medical Director 1 $290,040
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
(172) Exec. Associate Athletic Director 4 $257,245
(173) Head Basketball Coach 2 $255,265
(174) Head Football Coach 1 $255,265
(175) Physician - Health Center 12 $252,837
(176) Sr. Associate Athletic Director 5 $220,187
(177) Project/Program Administrator 102
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(178) IT Pool 11
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(179) Assoc. Dir. of Athletics 6 $197,212
(180) Asst. Football Coach 9 $186,183
(181) Defensive Coordinator 1 $186,183
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
(182) Offensive Coordinator 1 $186,183
(183) Head Gymnastics Coach 1 $174,177
(184) Head Track Coach 2 $174,177
(185) Assistant Director of Athletics 8 $167,448
(186) Director of Counseling 1 $165,548
(187) Dir. of Residence Life 1 $164,332
(188) Asst. Basketball Coach 6 $164,024
(189) Head Baseball Coach 1 $152,956
(190) Head Coach 2 $152,956
(191) Head Golf Coach 2 $152,956
(192) Head Soccer Coach 1 $152,956
(193) Head Softball Coach 1 $152,956
(194) Head Strength and Conditioning Coach 1 $152,956
(195) Head Swimming Coach 1 $152,956
(196) Head Tennis Coach 2 $152,956
(197) Head Volleyball Coach 1 $152,956
(198) Nutritionist 2 $144,761
(199) Marketing / Promotions Manager 3 $142,891
(200) Stadium Manager 1 $142,891
(201) Head Athletic Trainer 3 $132,571
(202) Advanced Practice Nurse 7 $127,234
(203) Patient Care Supervisor 1 $125,109
(204) Project Coordinator 11 $121,922
(205) Mental Health Clinician 24 $121,808
(206) Pilot 4 $121,663
(207) Academic Counselor 14 $120,656
(208) Student Development Specialist 14 $115,871
(209) Mental Health Professional I 3 $111,687
(210) Asst. Swimming Coach 2 $110,759
(211) Associate for Administration 5 $110,759
(212) Asst. Tennis Coach 2 $110,759
(213) Asst. Volleyball Coach 2 $110,759
(214) Media Facilities Coordinator 6 $110,759
(215) Assistant Golf Coach 2 $106,329
(216) Assistant Gymnastics Coach 2 $106,329
(217) Assistant Softball Coach 2 $106,329
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
(218) Asst. Track Coach 4 $106,329
(219) Assistant Coach 13 $106,328
(220) Asst. Baseball Coach 2 $106,328
(221) Asst. Soccer Coach 2 $106,328
(222) Registered Nurse III 10 $103,898
(223) Fiscal Support Pool 23
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(224) Asst. Trainer 18 $84,371
(225) UAF Assistant Business Manager 1 $81,860
(226) Procurement Coordinator 1 $78,713
(227) Graduate Assistant 14 $75,763
(228) Medical Technologist Supervisor 1 $75,685
(229) Skilled Trades Pool 57
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(230) Coord. of Sports Information 1 $72,774
(231) Associate Bookstore Manager 1 $69,975
(232) Buyer 1 $69,975
(233) HEI Program Coordinator 23 $69,975
(234) Administrative Support Pool 40
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(235) Medical Records Supervisor 2 $67,284
(236) Medical Technologist 8 $67,284
(237) Transit Operations Supervisor 5 $67,284
(238) Food Service Pool 1
Food Preparation Manager $64,696
Food Preparation Supervisor $57,515
Food Preparation Coordinator $51,130
Food Preparation Specialist $43,706
Food Preparation Technician $40,409
(239) Warehouse Manager 2 $64,696
(240) Inventory Control Manager 3 $62,208
(241) Landscape Supervisor 1 $62,208
(242) Legal Support Specialist 1 $62,208
(243) Licensed Practical Nurse 4 $62,208
(244) Logistics Manager 1 $62,208
(245) Medical Billing Specialist 4 $62,208
(246) Assistant Bookstore Manager 1 $59,815
(247) Auto/Diesel Mechanic 2 $59,815
(248) Medical Records Technician 4 $59,815
(249) Athletic Facilities Supervisor 10 $57,515
(250) Coordinator of Housekeeping 7 $57,515
(251) Collector 1 $55,302
(252) Landscape Specialist 1 $55,302
(253) Vehicle Facilities Coordinator 4 $55,302
(254) Laboratory Technician 1 $55,302
(255) Certified Nursing Assistant 8 $53,175
(256) Institutional Bus Driver 41 $53,175
(257) Cashier 3 $51,130
(258) Maintenance Assistant 5 $51,130
(259) Radio Dispatch Operator 5 $49,164
(260) Purchasing Assistant 1 $47,272
(261) Equipment Operator 1 $45,455
(262) Parking Control Officer 12 $45,455
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
(263) Shipping & Receiving Clerk 3 $45,455
(264) Institutional Services Supervisor 8 $43,706
(265) Institutional Services Assistant 77 $42,025
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 5,591

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the University of Arkansas - Fayetteville for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes:
three thousand two hundred eight (3,208) temporary or part-time employees,
when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the
University of Arkansas Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of
the University of Arkansas - Fayetteville for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $113,500,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 26,800,000
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 9,742,713
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) CONTINGENCY 7,502,136
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $157,544,849

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the University of Arkansas, to be payable from cash funds as defined by
Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating expenses of the
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
University of Arkansas - Fayetteville for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $371,000,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 35,000,000
(03) OVERTIME 3,500,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 82,000,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 218,050,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,000,000
(C) PROF. FEES 70,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 85,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 180,000,000
(07) DEBT SERVICE 88,600,000
(08) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 2,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,155,150,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS SCHOOL OF LAW. There
is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the
University of Arkansas Fund, from special revenues received from additional
uniform filing fees in circuit court as authorized by Arkansas Code Annotated
16-10-314, for expenses of the University of Arkansas - Fayetteville - School
of Law for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS SCHOOL OF LAW
EXPENSES $800,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - COLLEGE OF EDUCATION AND HEALTH PROFESSIONS
- PARTNERS FOR INCLUSIVE COMMUNITIES. There is hereby appropriated, to the
University of Arkansas, to be payable from the University of Arkansas Fund,
for personal services, maintenance and operating expenses, matching funds; or
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
grants for the development of a state center and satellite centers to provide
training, consultation, and support to families and professionals for autism
and related disabilities across the State, of the University of Arkansas -
Fayetteville - Partners for Inclusive Communities for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PARTNERS FOR INCLUSIVE COMMUNITIES -
PERSONAL SERVICES, MAINTENANCE AND
OPERATING EXPENSES, MATCHING, AND
GRANTS $250,000

SECTION 7. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 8. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 9. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040

SB127
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.




























01/27/2025 1:26:08 PM HAR040